Wyoming, session 2025, HB0029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-14-801(b)(v) and by creating a new
paragraph (vii) is amended to read:

39-14-801. Severance tax distributions; distribution
account created; formula.

HB0029

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0258
(b) Before making distributions from the severance
tax distribution account under subsections (c) through (e)
of this section, an amount equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the
amount of tax collected under W.S. 39-14-104(a)(i) and
(b)(i) and 39-14-204(a)(i) for the same period shall be
deposited as follows:

(v) For fiscal year 2023 through fiscal year
2028 2025, these funds shall be deposited equally to the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund and to the common
school account within the permanent land fund;

(vii) For fiscal year 2026 and thereafter, these
funds shall be deposited to the highway fund.

Section 2. W.S. 39-14-801(b)(vi) and (f) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0029